hunspell/new_xal.affix
FLAG long
SFX Vd Y 100
SFX Vd   х нав		х
SFX Vd   х нач		х
SFX Vd   х на		х
SFX Vd   х навидн	х
SFX Vd   х нат		х
SFX Vd   х җанав	х # прописать условие когда -чана
SFX Vd   х чанав	х #
SFX Vd   х җанач	х #
SFX Vd   х чанач	х #
SFX Vd   х җана		х #
SFX Vd   х чана		х #
SFX Vd   х җанавидн	х #
SFX Vd   х чанавидн 	х #
SFX Vd   х җанат 	х #
SFX Vd   х чанат 	х #
SFX Vd   х ав 		х
SFX Vd   х ач 		х
SFX Vd   х а 		х
SFX Vd   х авидн 	х
SFX Vd   х ат 		х
SFX Vd   х лав 		х
SFX Vd   х лач 		х
SFX Vd   х ла 		х
SFX Vd   х лавидн 	х
SFX Vd   х лат 		х
SFX Vd   х ув 		х
SFX Vd   х вч 		х
SFX Vd   х в 		х
SFX Vd   х увидн 	х
SFX Vd   х вт 		х
SFX Vd   х җв 		х # прописать условия когда -ч
SFX Vd   х чв 		х #
SFX Vd   х җч 		х #
SFX Vd   х чч 		х #
SFX Vd   х җ 		х #
SFX Vd   х ч 		х #
SFX Vd   х җвидн 	х #
SFX Vd   х чвидн 	х #
SFX Vd   х җт 		х #
SFX Vd   х чт 		х #
SFX Vd   0 в 		х 
SFX Vd   0 ч 		х
SFX Vd   0 видн		х
SFX Vd   0 т 		х
SFX Vd   х ад 		х
SFX Vd   х һад 		[иаоеыяюэәөуү]х
SFX Vd   х 0 		х
SFX Vd   х тн 		х
SFX Vd   х г 		х
SFX Vd   х тха 		х
SFX Vd   х й 		[иаоеыяюэәөуү]х
SFX Vd   х ий 		[бвжзкмпрсфшчцҗһң]х
SFX Vd   х ый 		[лндт]х

SFX Vm Y 100
SFX Vm   х нәв 		х
SFX Vm   х нәч 		х
SFX Vm   х нә 		х
SFX Vm   х нәвидн 	х
SFX Vm   х нәт 		х
SFX Vm   х җәнәв	х # прописать условие когда -чәнә
SFX Vm   х чәнәв 	х #
SFX Vm   х җәнәч 	х #
SFX Vm   х чәнәч 	х #
SFX Vm   х җәнә 	х #
SFX Vm   х чәнә 	х #
SFX Vm   х җәнәвидн 	х #
SFX Vm   х чәнәвидн 	х #
SFX Vm   х җәнәт 	х
SFX Vm   х чәнәт 	х
SFX Vm   х әв 		х
SFX Vm   х әч 		х
SFX Vm   х ә 		х
SFX Vm   х әвидн 	х
SFX Vm   х әт 		х
SFX Vm   х ләв 		х
SFX Vm   х ләч 		х
SFX Vm   х лә 		х
SFX Vm   х ләвидн 	х
SFX Vm   х ләт 		х
SFX Vm   х үв 		х
SFX Vm   х вч 		х
SFX Vm   х в 		х
SFX Vm   х үвидн 	х
SFX Vm   х вт 		х
SFX Vm   х җв 		х
SFX Vm   х чв 		х
SFX Vm   х җч 		х
SFX Vm   х чч 		х
SFX Vm   х җ 		х
SFX Vm   х ч 		х
SFX Vm   х җвидн 	х
SFX Vm   х чвидн 	х
SFX Vm   х җт 		х
SFX Vm   х чт 		х
SFX Vm   0 в 		х
SFX Vm   0 ч 		х
SFX Vm   0 видн 	х
SFX Vm   0 т 		х
SFX Vm   х әд 		х	
SFX Vm   х һәд 		[иаоеыяюэәөуү]х
SFX Vm   х 0 		х
SFX Vm   х тн 		х
SFX Vm   х г 		х
SFX Vm   х тхә 		х
SFX Vm   х й 		[иаоеыяюэәөуү]х
SFX Vm   х ий 		[глндтбвжзкмпрсфшчцҗһң]х
