hunspell/new_xal.dic
асрх/Vd
гих/Vm
багтх/Vd
бәрх/Vm
әәлчүлх/Vm
әәһүтхх/Vm
әәх-ичх/Vm
әгрәх/Vm
әдлцүлгдх/Vm
әмләх/Vm
әмтәсх/Vm
әмтәлх/Vm
чиихлтх/Vm
әрвлх/Vm
әркдх/Vm
әрүлх/Vm
эрчмлх/Vm
шивҗңнх/Vm
шигдх/Vm
шиигүлх/Vm
бәәлһх/Vm
бәргдх/Vm
бәрмтлүлх/Vm
шиимгрх/Vm
бедргдх/Vm
бекдх/Vm
белдх/Vm
белтрглх/Vm
беркшүлх/Vm
бертх/Vm
бийркх/Vm
билрәх/Vm
билцлх/Vm
бирчих/Vm
бичлцх/Vm
бишркх/Vm
шилҗүлх/Vm
бөкүлх/Vm
бөгшх/Vm
бөкилһх/Vm
бөөлҗүлх/Vm
бөөстәх/Vm
шимнх/Vm
шинҗлгдх/Vm
бүдүдх/Vm
бүләлх/Vm
бүлтлх/Vm
бүңнгдх/Vm
бүрдәгдх/Vm
бүркх/Vm
бүрүләтх/Vm
бүтәгдх/Vm
бүтүмҗлх/Vm
бүүрһүлх/Vm
гемшәгдҗәх/Vm
гедәкшлх/Vm
гемтәх/Vm
гелдглзх/Vm
генүлх/Vm
генрх/Vm
герлтүлх/Vm
гестх/Vm
гилвкх/Vm
гилвлзх/Vm
гиигрүлх/Vm
гилҗилһх/Vm
гиңнх/Vm
гөлглх/Vm
гөрәлүлх/Vm
гөрлх/Vm
гүдүлх/Vm
гүлдих/Vm
гүүдх/Vm
гүүцәх/Vm
дәәлгдх/Vm
дәәсрхх/Vm
дәвх/Vm
шинлгдх/Vm
деградацлх/Vm
шиңшүлх/Vm
девскрлх/Vm
делскгдх/Vm
дегдгнүлх/Vm
дегҗүлх/Vm
деегүрдүлх/Vm
дееҗлх/Vm
деермглх/Vm
дежурлх/Vm
чиклх/Vm
делдилһх/Vm
делскүлх/Vm
демҗх/Vm
деңкилһх/Vm
дерлүлх/Vm
диилүлх/Vm
димирх/Vm
дөгдлх/Vm
дөңнх/Vm
дөрвлҗлгдх/Vm
дөрсәх/Vm
эдрңнх/Vm
дүңгәх/Vm
дүңшүлх/Vm
дүрлх/Vm
дүүгүлх/Vm
дүүрәлх/Vm
евргдх/Vm
җивкнх/Vm
җивртүлх/Vm
җигрглүлх/Vm
ширвлзх/Vm
җиҗглүлх/Vm
җиирх/Vm
җилвәдх/Vm
җилих/Vm
эҗгәдх/Vm
җиңнх/Vm
җиргх/Vm
җирһәх/Vm
җиртих/Vm
җөөлдкх/Vm
зәәдңнх/Vm
зәәцх/Vm
зәңглх/Vm
ширких/Vm
зеврх/Vm
зелвкүлх/Vm
земдх/Vm
зергцх/Vm
зерлгшүлх/Vm
шитлүлх/Vm
зеткрлх/Vm
зөвүртх/Vm
зөвшәх/Vm
зөөртүлх/Vm
зөрлцүлх/Vm
зүглүлх/Vm
зүслх/Vm
зүсх/Vm
зүүлх/Vm
ивтрүлх/Vm
идлцх/Vm
идшлх/Vm
иигх/Vm
икдүлгдх/Vm
илҗрх/Vm
илвдх/Vm
илдкх/Vm
илрх/Vm
импортлх/Vm
инәх/Vm
инцглх/Vm
чилх/Vm
чимкәрлх/Vm
йөрәлүлх/Vm
ирзәлһх/Vm
ирмх/Vm
исх/Vm
ицүлх/Vm
чиигтәх/Vm
чиндрлгдх/Vm
кевлүлх/Vm
чинрлх/Vm
кедх/Vm
кеерлх/Vm
келгүлх/Vm
чиңнгдх/Vm
келтлх/Vm
кемлх/Vm
керәлх/Vm
керсүдх/Vm
киврүлх/Vm
кецәх/Vm
кизрңнх/Vm
киисх/Vm
килмҗлх/Vm
кимрх/Vm
кирмглх/Vm
киртх/Vm
кичглх/Vm
көвклзх/Vm
көвх/Vm
көглүлх/Vm
көдәлх/Vm
шпионлх/Vm
көзрцх/Vm
көлглүлх/Vm
көлргх/Vm
көлчәх/Vm
көндәрүлх/Vm
көөгдх/Vm
көөмглх/Vm
көөсрх/Vm
көрңглх/Vm
көтрлдх/Vm
көшх/Vm
күгдлх/Vm
күкрсх/Vm
күлглзх/Vm
күндлүлх/Vm
күрздх/Vm
күргх/Vm
күрңтүлх/Vm
күүлгдх/Vm
күүндгдх/Vm
күүрсх/Vm
эзлүлх/Vm
күчңдх/Vm
линчеватлулх/Vm
мәкилһх/Vm
мегшх/Vm
меклгдх/Vm
мелмәлһх/Vm
мендлдх/Vm
меңсүлх/Vm
мергҗүлх/Vm
метклдүлх/Vm
мишәлһх/Vm
мөлкүлх/Vm
мөрәлх/Vm
мөөрүлх/Vm
мөргх/Vm
мөчлдүлх/Vm
нәәҗлдүлх/Vm
нәәмәдлүлх/Vm
нәәрх/Vm
нәрвтрх/Vm
эрлх/Vm
неех/Vm
нүцклүлх/Vm
нерәдүлх/Vm
нерлүлх/Vm
нигтрүлгдх/Vm
ниицх/Vm
нимглдгдх/Vm
нирглдх/Vm
ниткрүлх/Vm
нөҗгрх/Vm
нөөрмүлх/Vm
эрүлдүлх/Vm
нүгшүлх/Vm
һәрглх/Vm
нүүрцүлх/Vm
элгсх/Vm
һәәхлдх/Vm
һәргтәрхх/Vm
чирдүлх/Vm
чирчих/Vm
чичрулх/Vm
өвдглх/Vm
өгшлүлх/Vm
өвслүлх/Vm
өгйәлх/Vm
өгтмнх/Vm
өздңнх/Vm
өлвкх/Vm
өлгүлх/Vm
өнрҗх/Vm
өмгх/Vm
өңгрх/Vm
өндәлһх/Vm
өндртүлх/Vm
өөглх/Vm
өңгрәх/Vm
өөклх/Vm
өөрдүлх/Vm
өрәлдгдх/Vm
өрвәгдх/Vm
өргәлх/Vm
өрглцх/Vm
өрлх/Vm
өрчлх/Vm
өскәлдүлх/Vm
эндүргдх/Vm
өтлх/Vm
өшрәх/Vm
репетицлх/Vm
сәәрхх/Vm
сәәшлцх/Vm
сәкүлх/Vm
элкдүлх/Vm
севшх/Vm
сегсргдх/Vm
седклх/Vm
сеҗглх/Vm
селәлх/Vm
селемдүлх/Vm
семчүлх/Vm
сеңкәх/Vm
сергмҗлх/Vm
сертәх/Vm
сиигх/Vm
сиичлх/Vm
сөдрх/Vm
сөөх/Vm
сөрсәх/Vm
шүргх/Vm
сүвлүлх/Vm
шүтәлх/Vm
сүрдх/Vm
сүүдртүлх/Vm
сүүрлүлх/Vm
тәәһлх/Vm
тәвх/Vm
тәкрх/Vm
тәмрлх/Vm
шүүрлдх/Vm
эмнгдх/Vm
тевкрлх/Vm
тевклх/Vm
тевчх/Vm
тегшлх/Vm
теерх/Vm
телүрдх/Vm
телх/Vm
темдглгдх/Vm
темтрх/Vm
эвклдх/Vm
теңцәрх/Vm
тергүлх/Vm
тесгдх/Vm
теткх/Vm
тииргдх/Vm
эклүлх/Vm
эволюцлх/Vm
төвлх/Vm
төгрглх/Vm
төөнлгдх/Vm
төмрдүлх/Vm
төөмдгдх/Vm
төөрх/Vm
түлгдх/Vm
түдх/Vm
түлкүрлх/Vm
түүмрдүлх/Vm
түркгдх/Vm
түүкәдх/Vm
түүх/Vm
чөклүлх/Vm
чөөҗлх/Vm
үвлзх/Vm
үдлх/Vm
үзглх/Vm
үзх/Vm
үрглҗлүлх/Vm
үлудх/Vm
үмгх/Vm
үмкцхәх/Vm
үмтрх/Vm
үнркүлх/Vm
үнтәрүлх/Vm
үрәлһх/Vm
үрглүлх/Vm
үслүлх/Vm
үүдх/Vm
үүлх/Vm
үүрүлх/Vm
хәәгдх/Vm
хәәлх/Vm
хәәрлүлх/Vm
хәәчлх/Vm
хәврүлх/Vm
хәргдх/Vm
хәрүлх/Vm
энлх/Vm
хөмх/Vm
хөрүлх/Vm
хүвәрлүлх/Vm
хүврүлх/Vm
хүрмлх/Vm
хүүхлзх/Vm
цәәлцхәх/Vm
цәңнх/Vm
цеврлх/Vm
цементлх/Vm
цервх/Vm
цөкрүлх/Vm
цөөрүлх/Vm
чиинрх/Vm
эвцлдүлх/Vm
элңкәрх/Vm
эрәлх/Vm
ээмдх/Vm
шанһлх/Vd
шаңнгдх/Vd
аадрх/Vd
шарлулх/Vd
аарглулх/Vd
аашлх/Vd
авангардлулх/Vd
авдрлх/Vd
авлулх/Vd
аврһдулх/Vd
авчкх/Vd
агдһлзх/Vd
агтлулх/Vd
адһулх/Vd
адучулх/Vd
шахгдх/Vd
аҗрһсулх/Vd
акадлх/Vd
актлх/Vd
алглулх/Vd
алдршах/Vd
аллцулх/Vd
алслх/Vd
алцһлзх/Vd
алятулх/Vd
амлх/Vd
амрглх/Vd
ачрхулх/Vd
андрх/Vd
аньх/Vd
аңһучлулх/Vd
аратньгдулх/Vd
арвдх/Vd
ариҗлулх/Vd
арһлулх/Vd
арсмнх/Vd
арцулх/Vd
асатх/Vd
асрх/Vd
асхх/Vd
атлх/Vd
атылһх/Vd
ахрдах/Vd
ачгдулх/Vd
ашлулх/Vd
бавилһх/Vd
баалх/Vd
баатршх/Vd
багталцх/Vd
багшулх/Vd
бадрх/Vd
базһулх/Vd
байрлулх/Vd
балартх/Vd
балвлзх/Vd
балһулх/Vd
балцлх/Vd
банздх/Vd
баһрулх/Vd
барвалһх/Vd
бархалһх/Vd
бархах/Vd
бахлурдх/Vd
батх/Vd
бахутх/Vd
башрдах/Vd
богтх/Vd
бокргдх/Vd
болвсрах/Vd
болһах/Vd
бомбдулх/Vd
боһчх/Vd
боосах/Vd
борвалһх/Vd
борлулх/Vd
босх/Vd
брошюрлх/Vd
будңһрулх/Vd
буйсах/Vd
булгтх/Vd
булталһх/Vd
булх/Vd
бурҗих/Vd
бурудулх/Vd
бурушах/Vd
бусрглх/Vd
буулһах/Vd
буурлтх/Vd
буучх/Vd
газификацлулх/Vd
госпитализацлх/Vd
даарулх/Vd
давслх/Vd
давулх/Vd
давхрлх/Vd
дагҗңнх/Vd
даҗрулх/Vd
далвалһх/Vd
далдлх/Vd
даях/Vd
дамҗлх/Vd
данах/Vd
даңшах/Vd
дарвалһх/Vd
дарзах/Vd
дасхах/Vd
даршлгдх/Vd
дахулх/Vd
докурдх/Vd
доһлулх/Vd
долагдх/Vd
долдалх/Vd
дольцх/Vd
дондһлзх/Vd
доһчлцх/Vd
дораһурдах/Vd
дорвлзх/Vd
дошх/Vd
дукчулх/Vd
дунах/Vd
дуһудх/Vd
дурлгдх/Vd
дурслулх/Vd
дусх/Vd
дуулх/Vd
җаавадх/Vd
җалдх/Vd
җаңһрлх/Vd
җолачлулх/Vd
җомнх/Vd
җулх/Vd
заагдх/Vd
заах/Vd
завсрлх/Vd
задһарулх/Vd
закрх/Vd
залмх/Vd
залргдх/Vd
зальврулх/Vd
замнх/Vd
заңзих/Vd
заңһх/Vd
заргдулх/Vd
зарх/Vd
затьлх/Vd
зовньх/Vd
зогсх/Vd
золһлдх/Vd
зоһдх/Vd
зудтах/Vd
зулулх/Vd
зураслулх/Vd
зуслх/Vd
зуулһх/Vd
шовхргдх/Vd
зууршлх/Vd
шоглх/Vd
шольгх/Vd
йовһлх/Vd
йогтлх/Vd
йорлулх/Vd
каагдх/Vd
каарх/Vd
кавҗрлулх/Vd
камчих/Vd
каркадх/Vd
квартирлх/Vd
шоодрглулх/Vd
ковньглх/Vd
комплектлх/Vd
коочилһх/Vd
шордх/Vd
шошалһх/Vd
курх/Vd
шугшх/Vd
лавлулх/Vd
ламлх/Vd
лашхах/Vd
лоңхулһх/Vd
лурҗңнулх/Vd
мааклх/Vd
магтлцх/Vd
шулудулх/Vd
малтлцх/Vd
малячх/Vd
мантулх/Vd
маңсих/Vd
марһулх/Vd
матилһх/Vd
мацулх/Vd
модьрудулх/Vd
мондалулх/Vd
моньднулх/Vd
ноостулх/Vd
моцх/Vd
мукх/Vd
мухлалх/Vd
муулх/Vd
һазадх/Vd
наалдулх/Vd
наких/Vd
налах/Vd
намһрулх/Vd
намхрулх/Vd
настх/Vd
наслулх/Vd
ногтлуулх/Vd
номерлх/Vd
номтрхх/Vd
ноолдулх/Vd
нохалх/Vd
нудрулх/Vd
нуһдих/Vd
нурһдулх/Vd
нутгшах/Vd
нуучлх/Vd
һавтх/Vd
һазалулх/Vd
һазршлулх/Vd
һалзрх/Vd
һанах/Vd
һаньдглулх/Vd
һаңхлзулх/Vd
һарһах/Vd
һаслх/Vd
һаслулх/Vd
һахульдулх/Vd
һашлх/Vd
һодах/Vd
һоҗулх/Vd
һолилһх/Vd
һомрхх/Vd
һооргдх/Vd
һорьклулх/Vd
һочкнулх/Vd
һувшх/Vd
һулҗих/Vd
һундрхах/Vd
һурвлҗлулх/Vd
һутах/Vd
һуульһулх/Vd
овах/Vd
овхах/Vd
одгдх/Vd
олдулх/Vd
олих/Vd
омглулх/Vd
онлулх/Vd
онцлх/Vd
оньглх/Vd
оңһалһх/Vd
оһтрлгдх/Vd
шунмһалулх/Vd
оошах/Vd
оралулх/Vd
оркрх/Vd
ормалһх/Vd
шурҗңнх/Vd
ортглх/Vd
оршах/Vd
салвалһх/Vd
шуулулх/Vd
шухих/Vd
паспортлх/Vd
саарулх/Vd
саарх/Vd
савадх/Vd
саврдх/Vd
садрх/Vd
салалулх/Vd
салврх/Vd
салһх/Vd
салькдулх/Vd
самргдх/Vd
сангдх/Vd
саңһслх/Vd
сартах/Vd
сарҗңнх/Vd
сарулдх/Vd
совшх/Vd
солңһтрх/Vd
сольлдх/Vd
сонрдулх/Vd
соньрхх/Vd
сохрулх/Vd
сумлгдх/Vd
суңһах/Vd
сурулх/Vd
таавалулх/Vd
таасгдх/Vd
тагдалһх/Vd
такрулх/Vd
тальврлх/Vd
таньгдх/Vd
таңхрх/Vd
тартах/Vd
татгдх/Vd
тахшх/Vd
товчлулх/Vd
тодлулх/Vd
толһадх/Vd
томрх/Vd
тоңһрцглулх/Vd
тоосрх/Vd
торлцх/Vd
тостулх/Vd
тохгдх/Vd
тошх/Vd
чорхадх/Vd
туугдх/Vd
увдислх/Vd
угтулх/Vd
уҗх/Vd
улалх/Vd
умшх/Vd
унтрх/Vd
уһах/Vd
урлулх/Vd
урхдулх/Vd
усчах/Vd
утхх/Vd
уульңнулх/Vd
уух/Vd
шаанцглулх/Vd
хавдрлулх/Vd
хавцлх/Vd
хавх/Vd
хагсх/Vd
хаҗих/Vd
хайлцх/Vd
халһулх/Vd
халцхалһх/Vd
хальстх/Vd
хамтх/Vd
ханцлулх/Vd
ханулх/Vd
хаһцх/Vd
харлулх/Vd
харһнх/Vd
харшулх/Vd
хатучрхх/Vd
хашалгдх/Vd
шавртгдх/Vd
хольҗх/Vd
хольвлх/Vd
хонгшулх/Vd
шавхаглх/Vd
хорлулх/Vd
хорһслх/Vd
хотлгдх/Vd
хошлх/Vd
худрх/Vd
хумсдулх/Vd
хуһчулх/Vd
хурҗңнх/Vd
шалдңнх/Vd
хурцлх/Vd
хуулулх/Vd
хуурулх/Vd
хуцх/Vd
цавглх/Vd
цадхах/Vd
цаңһах/Vd
цаһарулх/Vd
цахах/Vd
цацурулх/Vd
цольгулх/Vd
цоохрдах/Vd
цувулх/Vd
цумрулх/Vd
цухрулх/Vd
цуцргдх/Vd
чангдх/Vd
шамдах/Vd
шарҗңнх/Vd
ялдах/Vd
ярвах/Vd
ятхдулх/Vd
харх/Vd
